Tennessee, session 114, HB2090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-14-302(11), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(11) "Public swimming pool":
(A) Means a structure of man-made materials, located either indoors or
outdoors, used for bathing or swimming, or for instructional purposes in
swimming, diving, or other aquatic activities by humans, together with buildings,
appurtenances, and equipment used in connection with the structure;
(B) Includes spa-type, wading, special purpose pools, or water recreation
attractions including, but not limited to, those operated at or in camps, child care
facilities, cities, clubs, subdivisions, apartment buildings, counties, institutions,
schools, motels, hotels, and mobile home parks to which admission may be
gained with or without payment of a fee; and
(C) Does not include a privately owned, above-ground swimming pool
that:
(1) Is sited indoors at the location of, or a location affiliated with, a
fitness facility;
(2) Is installed according to manufacturer instructions;
(3) Has controlled access that prevents unauthorized entry by
anyone other than facility staff;
HB2090
010926
- 1 -

(4) Has functioning equipment necessary to ensure safe water
quality and cleanliness;
(5) Is used only by facility staff and students for the purpose of
swimming instruction; and
(6) Is not used for rental, parties, or open swimming sessions by
fitness facility members or customers.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010926